de: Steckertyp der Anhängerverkabelung: 4-polig flach; 5-polig flach; 6-polig rund; 6-polig rund (Mittelstift); 7-polig RV-Flachstecker; 7-polig rund (Flachstecker); 7-polig rund (Rundstecker); 8-polig; 9-polig; Blanke Drähte/Pigtail; Fahrzeugspezifisch (OEM-Stil); Sonstige
pl: Typ złącza okablowania przyczepy: 4-pinowe płaskie; 5-pinowe płaskie; 6-pinowe okrągłe; 6-pinowe okrągłe (pin środkowy); 7-stykowe płaskie kempingowe (RV); 7-stykowe okrągłe (złącze płaskie); 7-stykowe okrągłe (złącze pinowe); 8-pinowe; 9-pinowe; Przewód bez izolacji / przewód z wtyczką (pigtail); Dedykowane (w stylu OEM); Inne
zh-CN: 拖车线束连接器类型: 4 针扁平; 5 针扁平; 6 针圆形; 6 针圆形（中心引脚）; 7 针房车扁插; 7 针圆形（扁插）; 7 针圆形（圆插）; 8 针; 9 针; 裸线/尾纤; 车型专用（OEM 样式）; 其他
it: Tipo di connettore del cablaggio del rimorchio: A 4 poli piatto; A 5 poli piatto; A 6 poli tondo; A 6 poli tondo (pin centrale); A lama RV a 7 vie; A 7 vie tondo (a lama); A 7 vie tondo (a pin); A 8 pin; A 9 pin; Filo nudo/pigtail; Specifico per veicolo (stile OEM); Altro
fi: Perävaunun johdotuksen liitintyyppi: 4-napainen litteä; 5-napainen litteä; 6-napainen pyöreä; 6-napainen pyöreä (keskinasta); 7-napainen RV-lattaliitin; 7-napainen pyöreä (lattaliitin); 7-napainen pyöreä (nastaliitin); 8-napainen; 9-napainen; Paljas johto / kytkentäjohto; Ajoneuvokohtainen (OEM-tyylinen); Muu
bg-BG: Тип конектор за електрическата инсталация на ремаркето: 4-пинов плосък; 5-пинов плосък; 6-пинов кръгъл; 6-пинов кръгъл (с централен щифт); 7-пинов RV плосък; 7-пинов кръгъл (с плоски клеми); 7-пинов кръгъл (с кръгли щифтове); 8-пинов; 9-пинов; Оголен проводник / кабелна опашка; Специфичен за автомобила (OEM стил); Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka ožičenja priklopnika: 4-polni ploščati; 5-polni ploščati; 6-polni okrogli; 6-polni okrogli (sredinski kontakt); 7-polni RV (ploščati kontakti); 7-polni okrogli (ploščati kontakti); 7-polni okrogli (okrogli kontakti); 8-polni; 9-polni; Gola žica / kabel s priključkom; Specifično za vozilo (v slogu OE); Drugo
tr: Römork kablo bağlantı tipi: 4'lü düz; 5'li düz; 6'lı yuvarlak; 6'lı yuvarlak (orta pim); 7 yollu karavan (bıçak); 7 yollu yuvarlak (bıçak); 7 yollu yuvarlak (pim); 8 pimli; 9 pimli; Çıplak tel/pigtail; Araca özel (OEM tarzı); Diğer
el: Τύπος συνδετήρα καλωδίωσης τρέιλερ: Επίπεδο 4 ακίδων; Επίπεδο 5 ακίδων; Στρογγυλό 6 ακίδων; Στρογγυλό 6 ακίδων (μεσαία ακίδα); RV πλακέ 7 κατευθύνσεων; Στρογγυλό 7 κατευθύνσεων (πλακέ ακίδα); Στρογγυλό 7 κατευθύνσεων (κυλινδρική ακίδα); 8 ακίδων; 9 ακίδων; Γυμνό καλώδιο / πλεξούδα; Ειδικό για όχημα (τύπου ΟΕΜ); Άλλο
ru: Тип разъема проводки прицепа: 4-контактный плоский; 5-контактный плоский; 6-контактный круглый; 6-контактный круглый (центральный контакт); 7-контактный плоский (RV); 7-контактный круглый (плоские клеммы); 7-контактный круглый (круглые клеммы); 8-контактный; 9-контактный; Оголенный провод / косичка; Под конкретный автомобиль (в стиле OEM); Другое
vi: Loại kết nối dây dẫn của đoạn giới thiệu: Dẹp 4 chấu; Dẹp 5 chấu; Tròn 6 chấu; Tròn 6 chấu (chốt ở giữa); Lưỡi dẹp 7 chiều dùng cho RV; Tròn 7 chiều (lưỡi dẹp); Tròn 7 chiều (chốt tròn); 8 chấu; 9 chấu; Dây trần / Dây bện; Dành riêng cho xe (kiểu OEM); Khác
sv: Typ av kabelanslutning för släpvagn: 4-polig platt; 5-polig platt; 6-polig rund; 6-polig rund (mittstift); 7-polig RV-bladkontakt; 7-polig rund (bladstift); 7-polig rund (runt stift); 8-polig; 9-polig; Blank ledare/pigtail; Fordonsspecifik (OEM-stil); Övrigt
es: Tipo de conector de cableado del remolque: Plano de 4 vías; Plano de 5 vías; Redondo de 6 vías; Redondo de 6 vías (pin central); Cuchilla de RV de 7 vías; Redondo de 7 vías (cuchilla); Redondo de 7 vías (pin); 8 pines; 9 pines; Cable pelado/pigtail; Específico del vehículo (estilo OEM); Otro
da: Stiktype for trailertilslutning: 4-polet flad; 5-polet flad; 6-polet rund; 6-polet rund (midterstift); 7-polet RV-fladstik; 7-polet rund (fladstik); 7-polet rund (rundstik); 8-polet; 9-polet; Blottet ledning / pigtail; Køretøjsspecifikt (OEM-stil); Andet
nl: Trailerbekabeling connectortype: 4-flat; 5-flat; 6-rond; 6-rond (centerpin); 7-way RV blade; 7-way rond (blade); 7-way rond (pin); 8-pins; 9-pins; Blote draad / pigtail; Voertuigspecifiek (OEM-stijl); Overig
pt-BR: Fiação de reboque tipo de conector: Plano de 4 pinos; Plano de 5 pinos; Redondo de 6 pinos; Redondo de 6 pinos (pino central); Lâmina de RV de 7 vias; Redondo de 7 vias (lâmina); Redondo de 7 vias (pino); 8 pinos; 9 pinos; Fio desencapado / rabicho; Específico para o veículo (estilo OEM); Outro
fr: Type de connecteur du câblage de remorque: Plat 4 broches; Plat 5 broches; Rond 6 broches; Rond 6 broches (broche centrale); Lame de VR 7 voies; Rond 7 voies (lame); Rond 7 voies (broche); 8 broches; 9 broches; Fil dénudé / raccord; Spécifique au véhicule (style FEO); Autre
ja: トレーラー配線コネクタータイプ: 4ピンプラグ (平型); 5ピンプラグ (平型); 6ピンプラグ (丸型); 6ピンプラグ (丸型・センターピン); 7極RVブレード; 7極丸型 (ブレード); 7極丸型 (ピン); 8ピン; 9ピン; 裸線 / ピッグテール; 車種専用 (OEMスタイル); その他
cs: Typ konektoru elektroinstalace přívěsu: 4pólový plochý; 5pólový plochý; 6pólový kulatý; 6pólový kulatý (se středovým kolíkem); 7pólový RV (ploché konektory); 7pólový kulatý (ploché konektory); 7pólový kulatý (kolíky); 8pinový; 9pinový; Holý vodič / pigtail; Specifický pro vozidlo (styl OEM); Jiný
pt-PT: Tipo de conector da cablagem do reboque: Plano de 4 vias; Plano de 5 vias; Redondo de 6 vias; Redondo de 6 vias (pino central); Lâmina de RV de 7 vias; Redondo de 7 vias (lâmina); Redondo de 7 vias (pino); 8 pinos; 9 pinos; Fio descarnado/pigtail; Específico para o veículo (estilo OEM); Outro
lt-LT: Priekabos laidų jungties tipas: 4 kontaktų plokščia; 5 kontaktų plokščia; 6 kontaktų apvali; 6 kontaktų apvali (su centriniu kontaktu); 7 kontaktų RV tipo plokščiais kontaktais; 7 kontaktų apvali (plokšti kontaktai); 7 kontaktų apvali (apvalūs kontaktai); 8 kontaktų; 9 kontaktų; Atviri laidai / „pigtail“ jungtis; Skirta konkrečiai transporto priemonei (OEM stiliaus); Kita
sk-SK: Typ konektora zapojenia prívesu: 4-kolíkový plochý; 5-kolíkový plochý; 6-kolíkový okrúhly; 6-kolíkový okrúhly (stredový kolík); 7-pólový karavanový (plochý kontakt); 7-pólový okrúhly (plochý kontakt); 7-pólový okrúhly (kolíkový kontakt); 8-kolíkový; 9-kolíkový; Holý vodič/pigtail; Špecifické pre vozidlo (štýl OEM); Iné
zh-TW: 拖車配線接頭類型: 4 針扁平; 5 針扁平; 6 針圓形; 6 針圓形 (中心針); 7 針露營車刀片; 7 針圓形 (刀片); 7 針圓形 (圓針); 8 針; 9 針; 裸線/引線; 特定車款專用 (OEM 款式); 其他
nb: Ledningstilkoblingstype for tilhenger: 4-polet flat; 5-polet flat; 6-polet rund; 6-polet rund (senterpinne); 7-polet bobil (blad); 7-polet rund (blad); 7-polet rund (pinne); 8-polet; 9-polet; Bar ledning / pigtail; Kjøretøyspesifikk (OEM-stil); Annet
hu: Utánfutó kábelcsatlakozójának típusa: 4 pólusú lapos; 5 pólusú lapos; 6 pólusú kerek; 6 pólusú kerek (középső érintkezővel); 7 pólusú lakókocsi (késes); 7 pólusú kerek (késes); 7 pólusú kerek (tűs); 8 pólusú; 9 pólusú; Csupasz vezeték / pigtail; Járműspecifikus (OEM stílusú); Egyéb
en: Trailer wiring connector type: 4-flat; 5-flat; 6-round; 6-round (center pin); 7-way RV blade; 7-way round (blade); 7-way round (pin); 8-pin; 9-pin; Bare wire / pigtail; Vehicle-specific (OEM-style); Other
th: ขั้วต่อสายไฟรถพ่วง: 4 พินแบบแบน; 5 พินแบบแบน; 6 พินแบบกลม; 6 พินแบบกลม (พินกลาง); RV 7 พินแบบแบน; 7 พินแบบกลม (แบน); 7 พินแบบกลม (พิน); 8 พิน; 9 พิน; สายไฟเปลือย / ปลั๊กพ่วง; เฉพาะยานพาหนะ (สไตล์ OEM); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta konektora ožičenja prikolice: 4-pinski ravni; 5-pinski ravni; 6-pinski okrugli; 6-pinski okrugli (središnji kontakt); 7-pinski plosnati (RV); 7-pinski okrugli (plosnati); 7-polni okrugli (pinski); 8-pinski; 9-pinski; Gola žica / pigtail kabel; Specifično za vozilo (OEM stil); Ostalo
ko: 트레일러 배선 커넥터 유형: 4-플랫; 5-플랫; 6-라운드; 6-라운드(센터 핀); 7웨이 RV 블레이드; 7웨이 라운드(블레이드); 7웨이 라운드(핀); 8핀; 9핀; 나선/피그테일; 차량별(OEM 스타일); 기타
ro-RO: Tipul conectorului pentru cablajul remorcii: Plat cu 4 pini; Plat cu 5 pini; Rotund cu 6 pini; Rotund cu 6 pini (pin central); Lamelă cu 7 pini RV; Rotund cu 7 pini (lamelă); Rotund cu 7 pini (pin); 8 pini; 9 pini; Fir neizolat / pigtail; Specific vehiculului (stil OEM); Altele